District of Columbia statutes.
16-2826

Mediator’s report.

A mediator’s report shall be filed with the court no later than 10 days after the mediation has terminated, informing the court regarding:

(1)

Attendance;

(2)

Whether a settlement was reached; or

(3)

If a settlement was not reached, any agreements to narrow the scope of the dispute, limit discovery, facilitate future settlement, hold another mediation session, or otherwise reduce the cost and time of trial preparation.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807